test/src/morphology/vep-test-N-marj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - marj: # Noun 'berry / marja' - full paradigm
     marj+N+Sg+Nom: marj
     marj+N+Sg+Gen: marjan
     marj+N+Sg+Acc: [marj, marjan]
     marj+N+Sg+Par: marjad
     marj+N+Sg+Tra: marjaks
     marj+N+Sg+Abe: marjata
     marj+N+Sg+Com: marjanke
     marj+N+Sg+Ine: marjas
     marj+N+Sg+Ela: marjaspäi
     marj+N+Sg+Ill: marjaha
     marj+N+Sg+Ade: marjal
     marj+N+Sg+Abl: marjalpäi
     marj+N+Sg+All: marjale
     marj+N+Sg+EssInst: marjan
     marj+N+Sg+Prl: marjadme
     marj+N+Sg+Apr1: marjanno
     marj+N+Sg+Apr2: marjannoks
     marj+N+Sg+Egr: marjannopäi
     marj+N+Sg+Ter1: marjahosai
     marj+N+Sg+Ter2: marjalesai
     marj+N+Sg+Ter3: marjassai
     marj+N+Sg+Add1: marjahopäi
     marj+N+Sg+Add2: marjalepäi

     marj+N+Pl+Nom: marjad
     marj+N+Pl+Gen: [marjoid'en, marjoiden] # checking needed
     marj+N+Pl+Acc: marjad
     marj+N+Pl+Par: marjoid
     marj+N+Pl+Tra: marjoikš
     marj+N+Pl+Abe: marjoita
     marj+N+Pl+Com: marjoidenke
     marj+N+Pl+Ine: marjoiš
     marj+N+Pl+Ela: marjoišpäi
     marj+N+Pl+Ill: marjoihe
     marj+N+Pl+Ade: marjoil
     marj+N+Pl+Abl: marjoilpäi
     marj+N+Pl+All: marjoile
     marj+N+Pl+EssInst: marjoin
     marj+N+Pl+Prl: marjoidme
     marj+N+Pl+Apr1: marjoidenno
     marj+N+Pl+Apr2: marjoidennoks
     marj+N+Pl+Egr: marjoidennopäi
     marj+N+Pl+Ter1: marjoihesai
     marj+N+Pl+Ter2: marjoilesai
     marj+N+Pl+Add1: marjoihepäi
     marj+N+Pl+Add2: marjoilepäi

     marj+N+Sg+Nom+Clt: marjki
     marj+N+Sg+Gen+Clt: marjanki
     marj+N+Sg+Acc+Clt: [marjki, marjanki]
     marj+N+Sg+Par+Clt: marjadki
     marj+N+Sg+Tra+Clt: marjakski
     marj+N+Sg+Abe+Clt: marjataki
     marj+N+Sg+Com+Clt: marjankeki
     marj+N+Sg+Ine+Clt: marjaski
     marj+N+Sg+Ela+Clt: marjaspäiki
     marj+N+Sg+Ill+Clt: marjahoki
     marj+N+Sg+Ade+Clt: marjalki
     marj+N+Sg+Abl+Clt: marjalpäiki
     marj+N+Sg+All+Clt: marjaleki
     marj+N+Sg+EssInst+Clt: marjanki
     marj+N+Sg+Prl+Clt: marjadmeki
     marj+N+Sg+Apr1+Clt: marjannoki
     marj+N+Sg+Apr2+Clt: marjannokski
     marj+N+Sg+Egr+Clt: marjannopäiki
     marj+N+Sg+Ter1+Clt: marjahosaiki
     marj+N+Sg+Ter2+Clt: marjalesaiki
     marj+N+Sg+Ter3+Clt: marjassaiki
     marj+N+Sg+Add1+Clt: marjahopäiki
     marj+N+Sg+Add2+Clt: marjalepäiki

     marj+N+Pl+Nom+Clt: marjadki
     marj+N+Pl+Gen+Clt: [marjoid'enki, marjoidenki] # Check
     marj+N+Pl+Acc+Clt: marjadki
     marj+N+Pl+Par+Clt: marjoidki
     marj+N+Pl+Tra+Clt: marjoikški
     marj+N+Pl+Abe+Clt: marjoitaki
     marj+N+Pl+Com+Clt: marjoidenkeki
     marj+N+Pl+Ine+Clt: marjoiški
     marj+N+Pl+Ela+Clt: marjoišpäiki
     marj+N+Pl+Ill+Clt: marjoiheki
     marj+N+Pl+Ade+Clt: marjoilki
     marj+N+Pl+Abl+Clt: marjoilpäiki
     marj+N+Pl+All+Clt: marjoileki
     marj+N+Pl+EssInst+Clt: marjoinki
     marj+N+Pl+Prl+Clt: marjoidmeki
     marj+N+Pl+Apr1+Clt: marjoidennoki
     marj+N+Pl+Apr2+Clt: marjoidennokski
     marj+N+Pl+Egr+Clt: marjoidennopäiki
     marj+N+Pl+Ter1+Clt: marjoihesaiki
     marj+N+Pl+Ter2+Clt: marjoilesaiki
     marj+N+Pl+Add1+Clt: marjoihepäiki
     marj+N+Pl+Add2+Clt: marjoilepäiki
  
